hr-HR: Osi stabilizacije gimbala: 1-osni; 2-osni; 3-osni; Kontinuirana rotacija od 360°; 4-osni; Nije primjenjivo; Ostalo
es: Ejes de estabilización del cardán: 1 eje; 2 ejes; 3 ejes; Rotación continua de 360°; 4 ejes; No aplicable; Otros
ro-RO: Axe de stabilizare a mecanismului cardanic: 1 axă; 2 axe; 3 axe; Rotație continuă la 360°; 4 axe; Nu se aplică; Altele
pl: Osie stabilizacji gimbala: 1-osiowy; 2-osiowy; 3-osiowy; 360° ciągły obrót; 4-osiowy; Nie dotyczy; Inne
th: แกนกันสั่นแบบกิมบอล: แกนเดียว; 2 แกน; 3 แกน; การหมุนต่อเนื่อง 360°; 4 แกน; ไม่สามารถใช้ได้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Eixos de estabilização do gimbal: 1 eixo; 2 eixos; 3 eixos; Rotação contínua de 360°; 4 eixos; Não aplicável; Outro
da: Gimbal-stabiliseringsakser: 1 akse; 2 akser; 3 akser; 360° kontinuerlig rotation; 4 akser; Ikke relevant; Andet
nl: Gimbal-stabilisatieassen: 1-as; 2-as; 3-as; 360° continue rotatie; 4-as; Niet van toepassing; Andere
fi: Gimbaalin vakautusakselit: 1-akselinen; 2-akselinen; 3-akselinen; 360° jatkuva kierto; 4-akselinen; Ei sovelleta; Muu
de: Kardanstabilisierungsachsen: 1-Achse; 2-Achsen; 3-Achsen; 360° kontinuierliche Drehung; 4-Achsen; Nicht zutreffend; Sonstiges
nb: Gimbal-stabiliseringsakser: 1 akse; 2 akser; 3 akser; Kontinuerlig rotasjon i 360 grader; 4 akser; Ikke relevant; Annet
ja: ジンバル安定化軸: 1軸; 2軸; 3軸; 360度連続回転; 4軸; 適用できない; その他
sl-SI: Osi stabilizacije z gimbalom.: Enoosni; Dvoosni; Tritoosni; 360° neprekinjeno vrtenje; Štiriosni; Ni uporabno; Drugo
hu: Gimbal stabilizáló tengelyek: 1-tengelyes; 2-tengelyes; 3-tengelyes; 360°-os folyamatos forgatás; 4-tengelyes; Nem alkalmazható; Egyéb
zh-CN: 云台稳定轴数: 单轴; 双轴; 三轴; 360 度连续旋转; 四轴; 不适用; 其他
vi: Trục ổn định gimbal: 1 trục; 2 trục; 3 trục; Xoay liên tục 360°; 4 trục; Không áp dụng; Khác
bg-BG: Оси за стабилизиране на карданния вал: 1-осова; 2-осова; 3-осова; 360° непрекъснато въртене; 4-осова; Не е приложимо; Други
cs: Osy stabilizace gimbalu: 1 osa; 2 osy; 3 osy; Kontinuální otáčení o 360°; 4 osy; Není relevantní; Jiné
ko: 짐벌 안정화 축: 1축; 2축; 3축; 360° 연속 회전; 4축; 해당 없음; 기타
pt-BR: Eixos do gimbal: 1 eixo; 2 eixos; 3 eixos; Rotação contínua de 360°; 4 eixos; Não aplicável; Outro
sv: Gimbal-stabiliseringsaxlar: 1-axlig; 2-axlig; 3-axlig; 360° kontinuerlig rotation; 4-axlig; Ej tillämpligt; Övrigt
fr: Axes de stabilisation du cardan: 1 axe; 2 axe; 3 axe; Rotation continue à 360°; 4 axe; Non applicable; Autre
en: Gimbal stabilization axes: 1-axis; 2-axis; 3-axis; 360° continuous rotation; 4-axis; Not applicable; Other
sk-SK: Osi stabilizácie gimbalu: Jednoosový; Dvojosový; Trojosový; 360° nepretržitá rotácia; Štvorosový; Nevzťahuje sa; Iné
lt-LT: Gimbalo stabilizavimo ašys: 1 ašies; 2 ašių; 3 ašių; 360° nuolatinis sukimasis; 4 ašių; Netaikoma; Kita
ru: Оси стабилизации подвеса: 1 ось; 2 оси; 3 оси; Непрерывное вращение на 360°; 4 оси; Неприменимо; Другое
tr: Gimbal stabilizasyon eksenleri: 1 eksenli; 2 eksenli; 3 eksenli; 360° sürekli dönüş; 4 eksenli; Geçerli değil; Diğer
zh-TW: 平衡環架穩定軸: 1 軸; 2 軸; 3 軸; 360 度連續旋轉; 4 軸; 不適用; 其他
it: Assi di stabilizzazione del gimbal: 1 asse; 2 assi; 3 assi; Rotazione continua di 360°; 4 asse; Non applicabile; Altro
el: Άξονες σταθεροποίησης με gimbal: 1 άξονα; 2 αξόνων; 3 αξόνων; Συνεχής περιστροφή 360°; 4 αξόνων; Δεν ισχύει; Άλλο